Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 47. Insanity and Competency to Stand Trial.

Sec. 12.47.010.
Insanity as affirmative defense.

In a prosecution for a crime, it is an affirmative defense that when the defendant engaged in the criminal conduct, the defendant was unable, as a result of a mental disease or defect, to appreciate the nature and quality of that conduct.

The affirmative defense defined in (a) of this section may not be raised at trial unless the defendant, within 10 days of entering a plea or such later time as the court may for good cause permit, files a written notice of intent to rely on the defense.

Evidence of a mental disease or defect that is manifested only by repeated criminal or other antisocial conduct is not sufficient to establish the affirmative defense under (a) of this section.

The affirmative defense specified in (a) of this section is the affirmative defense of insanity. A defendant who successfully raises the affirmative defense of insanity shall be found not guilty by reason of insanity and the verdict shall so state.

History.

(§ 22 ch 143 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Definition of “affirmative defense,” “mental disease or defect” — AS

12.47.130

Form of verdict when evidence of mental disease or defect admissible — AS

12.47.040

Psychiatric examination — AS

12.47.070

Procedure after raising defense of insanity — AS

12.47.090

Original Code Provision — AS

12.45.083

.

Sec. 12.47.020.
Mental disease or defect negating culpable mental state.

Evidence that the defendant suffered from a mental disease or defect is admissible whenever it is relevant to prove that the defendant did or did not have a culpable mental state which is an element of the crime. However, evidence of mental disease or defect that tends to negate a culpable mental state is not admissible unless the defendant, within 10 days of entering a plea, or at such later time as the court may for good cause permit, files a written notice of intent to rely on that defense.

When the trier of fact finds that all other elements of the crime have been proved but, as a result of mental disease or defect, there is a reasonable doubt as to the existence of a culpable mental state that is an element of the crime, it shall enter a verdict of not guilty by reason of insanity. A defendant acquitted under this subsection, and not found guilty of a lesser included offense, shall automatically be considered to have established the affirmative defense of insanity under AS

12.47.010

. The defendant is then subject to the provisions of AS

12.47.090

.

If a verdict of not guilty by reason of insanity is reached under (b) of this section, the trier of fact shall also consider whether the defendant is guilty of any lesser included offense. If the defendant is convicted of a lesser included offense, the defendant shall be sentenced for that offense and shall automatically be considered guilty but mentally ill under AS

12.47.030

and

12.47.050

. Upon completion of a sentence for a lesser included offense, a hearing shall be held under AS

12.47.090(c)

to determine the necessity of further commitment of the defendant, based on the acquittal for the greater charge under (b) of this section. If the defendant is committed under AS

12.47.090(c)

, the defendant is subject to the provisions of AS

12.47.090(d)

— (i) and (k).

History.

(§ 22 ch 143 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Definition of “culpable mental state,” “mental disease or defect” — AS

12.47.130

Guilty but mentally ill — AS

12.47.030

Form of verdict when evidence of mental disease or defect admissible — AS

12.47.040

Disposition of defendant found guilty but mentally ill — AS

12.47.050

Procedure after raising defense of insanity — AS

12.47.090

Original Code Provision — AS

12.45.085

.

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1995, in subsection (c), “AS

12.47.090(d)

— (i) and (k)” was substituted for “AS

12.47.090(d)

— (j)” to reflect the 1995 relettering of AS

12.47.090(j)

and (k).

Sec. 12.47.030.
Guilty but mentally ill.

A defendant is guilty but mentally ill if, when the defendant engaged in the criminal conduct, the defendant lacked, as a result of a mental disease or defect, the substantial capacity either to appreciate the wrongfulness of that conduct or to conform that conduct to the requirements of law. A defendant found guilty but mentally ill is not relieved of criminal responsibility for criminal conduct and is subject to the provisions of AS

12.47.050

.

Evidence of a mental disease or defect that is manifested only by repeated criminal or antisocial conduct is not sufficient to establish that the defendant was guilty but mentally ill under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 22 ch 143 SLA 1982; am § 43 ch 6 SLA 1984)

Cross references. —

Definition of “mental disease or defect” — AS

12.47.130

Form of verdict when evidence of mental disease or defect admissible — AS

12.47.040

Disposition of defendant found guilty but mentally ill — AS

12.47.050

Original Code Provision — None.

Sec. 12.47.040.
Form of verdict in certain cases involving insanity or mental disease or defect.

In a prosecution for a crime when the affirmative defense of insanity is raised under AS

12.47.010

, or when evidence of a mental disease or defect of the defendant is otherwise admissible at trial under AS

12.47.020

, the trier of fact shall find, and the verdict shall state, whether the defendant is

guilty;

not guilty;

not guilty by reason of insanity; or

guilty but mentally ill.

To return a verdict under (a)(4) of this section, the fact finder must find beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant committed the crime and that, when the defendant committed the crime, the defendant was guilty but mentally ill as defined in AS

12.47.030

.

When the jury is instructed as to the verdicts under (a) of this section, it shall also be instructed on the dispositions available under AS

12.47.050

and

12.47.090

.

History.

(§ 22 ch 143 SLA 1982; am § 5 ch 70 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

Insanity excluding responsibility — AS

12.47.010

Mental disease or defect negating culpable mental state — AS

12.47.020

Guilty but mentally ill — AS

12.47.030

Disposition of defendant found guilty but mentally ill — AS

12.47.050

Procedure after raising defense of insanity — AS

12.47.090

Original Code Provision — None.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in (b), substituted “fact finder” for “jury” and deleted “find by a preponderance of the evidence” following “committed the crime and”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 70, SLA 2012 provides that the 2012 amendment to subsection (b) applies “to proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2012 for offenses occurring before, on, or after July 1, 2012.”

Sec. 12.47.050.
Disposition of defendant found guilty but mentally ill.

If the trier of fact finds that a defendant is guilty but mentally ill, the court shall sentence the defendant as provided by law and shall enter the verdict of guilty but mentally ill as part of the judgment.

The Department of Corrections shall provide mental health treatment to a defendant found guilty but mentally ill. The treatment must continue until the defendant no longer suffers from a mental disease or defect that causes the defendant to be dangerous to the public peace or safety. Subject to (c) and (d) of this section, the Department of Corrections shall determine the course of treatment.

When treatment terminates under (b) of this section, the defendant shall be required to serve the remainder of the sentence imposed.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, a defendant receiving treatment under (b) of this section may not be released

on furlough under AS

33.30.101

—

33.30.131

, except for treatment in a secure setting; or

on parole.

Not less than 30 days before the expiration of the sentence of a defendant found guilty but mentally ill, the commissioner of corrections shall file a petition under AS

47.30.700

for a screening investigation to determine the need for further treatment of the defendant if

the defendant is still receiving treatment under (b) of this section; and

the commissioner has good cause to believe that the defendant is suffering from a mental illness that causes the defendant to be dangerous to the public peace or safety; in this paragraph, “mental illness” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.915

.

History.

(§ 22 ch 143 SLA 1982; am E.O. No. 55, §§ 3, 4 (1984); am § 5 ch 88 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (e) was enacted as (f).
Relettered in 1982 when the original (e) was renumbered as AS

12.47.055

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Placements in properly licensed private treatment facilities became available for persons committed to the commissioner of the Department of Corrections, pursuant to AS

12.47.050(b)

, on September 4, 1986, when ch. 88, SLA 1986, became effective. July 8, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

“Treatment,” for purposes of this section, means the therapeutic milieu, process and/or medication employed by a mental health professional to achieve a behavioral state in the guilty but mentally ill inmate who is no longer dangerous to public peace or safety. December 5, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

The treatment and restrictions placed upon the guilty but mentally ill inmate need only last until a determination is made that the inmate is no longer dangerous to the public peace or safety. This determination does not mean that treatment must cease after the inmate is determined to be no longer dangerous. It means that the disabilities associated with this section may be removed upon determination that the inmate does not constitute a danger; he may then be “treated” like any other prisoner in need of psychological or psychiatric treatment. December 5, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

While legislative intent involuntarily subjects the guilty but mentally ill inmate to most conventional mental health treatment methods, approaches which fall within the “spirit of intrusion” reflected in such examples as psychosurgery and medical or psychiatric programs involving adverse conditioning should be closely scrutinized and applied only pursuant to clearly defined policy. December 5, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

The determination of whether a guilty but mentally ill inmate is a danger to public peace or safety rests with the commissioner. December 5, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

While at present it appears that there is no department policy whereby the guilty but mentally ill inmate can receive a review of dangerousness, without a “dangerousness review” there could be guilty but mentally ill inmates who, while behaviorally indistinguishable from the mentally ill offender in the general population, may be denied furlough or parole pursuant to AS

12.47.050(d)

, which would raise the serious question of denial of equal protection. December 5, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 12.47.055.
Treatment for other defendants not limited.

Nothing in AS

12.47.050

limits the discretion of the court to recommend, or of the Department of Corrections to provide, psychiatrically indicated treatment for a defendant who is not adjudged guilty but mentally ill.

History.

(§ 22 ch 143 SLA 1982; am E.O. No. 55, § 5 (1984))

Cross references. —

Definition of “mental disease or defect” — AS

12.47.130

Definition of “mental illness” — AS

47.30.915

Guilty but mentally ill — AS

12.47.030

Original Code Provision — None.

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

12.47.050(e)

. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 12.47.060.
Post conviction determination of mental illness.

In a prosecution for a crime when the affirmative defense of insanity is not raised and when evidence of mental disease or defect of the defendant is not admitted at trial under AS

12.47.020

, the defendant or the prosecuting attorney may raise the issue of whether the defendant is guilty but mentally ill. A party that seeks a post-conviction determination of guilty but mentally ill must give notice 10 days before trial of intent to do so; however, this deadline is waived if the opposing party presents evidence or argument at trial tending to show that the defendant may be guilty but mentally ill. A hearing must be held on this issue before the same fact finder that returned the verdict of guilty under procedures set by the court. In cases decided by a jury, at the request of the defendant and with the concurrence of the prosecuting attorney, the court may decide the issue. A waiver of consideration by a jury must be in writing and in person before the court. At the hearing, the fact finder shall determine whether the defendant has been shown to be guilty but mentally ill beyond a reasonable doubt, considering evidence presented at the hearing and any evidence relevant to the issue that was presented at trial.

If the fact finder finds that a defendant is guilty but mentally ill, the court shall sentence the defendant as provided by law and shall enter the finding of guilty but mentally ill as part of the judgment.

A defendant determined to be guilty but mentally ill under this section is subject to the provisions of AS

12.47.050

.

In this section, “guilty but mentally ill” has the meaning given in AS

12.47.030

.

History.

(§ 22 ch 143 SLA 1982; am §§ 6, 7 ch 70 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

Guilty but mentally ill — AS

12.47.030

Disposition of defendant found guilty but mentally ill — AS

12.47.050

Original Code Provision — None.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, rewrote (a); in (b), substituted “If the fact finder” for “If the court”, and made a stylistic change.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 70, SLA 2012 provides that the 2012 amendments to subsections (a) and (b) apply “to proceedings occurring on or after July 1, 2012 for offenses occurring before, on, or after July 1, 2012.”

Sec. 12.47.070.
Psychiatric examination.

If a defendant has filed a notice of intention to rely on the affirmative defense of insanity under AS

12.47.010

or has filed notice under AS

12.47.020(a)

, or there is reason to doubt the defendant’s fitness to proceed, or there is reason to believe that a mental disease or defect of the defendant will otherwise become an issue in the case, the court shall appoint at least two qualified psychiatrists or two forensic psychologists certified by the American Board of Forensic Psychology to examine and report upon the mental condition of the defendant. If the court appoints psychiatrists, the psychiatrists may select psychologists to provide assistance. If the defendant has filed notice under AS

12.47.090(a)

, the report shall consider whether the defendant can still be committed under AS

12.47.090(c)

. The court may order the defendant to be committed to a secure facility for the purpose of the examination for not more than 60 days or such longer period as the court determines to be necessary for the purpose and may direct that a qualified psychiatrist retained by the defendant be permitted to witness and participate in the examination.

In an examination under (a) of this section, any method may be employed which is accepted by the medical profession for the examination of those alleged to be suffering from mental disease or defect.

The report of an examination under (a) of this section shall include the following:

a description of the nature of the examination;

a diagnosis of the mental condition of the defendant;

if the defendant suffers from a mental disease or defect, an opinion as to the defendant’s capacity to understand the proceedings against the defendant and to assist in the defendant’s defense;

if a notice of intention to rely on the affirmative defense of insanity under AS

12.47.010(b)

has been filed, an opinion as to the extent, if any, to which the capacity of the defendant to appreciate the nature and quality of the defendant’s conduct was impaired at the time of the crime charged; and

if notice has been filed under AS

12.47.020(a)

, an opinion as to the capacity of the defendant to have a culpable mental state which is an element of the crime charged.

If the examination under (a) of this section cannot be conducted by reason of the unwillingness of the defendant to participate in it, the report shall so state and shall include, if possible, an opinion as to whether the unwillingness of the defendant was the result of mental disease or defect.

The report of the examination under (a) of this section shall be filed with the clerk of the court, who shall cause copies to be delivered to the prosecuting attorney and to counsel for the defendant.

History.

(§ 22 ch 143 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Insanity excluding responsibility — AS

12.47.010

Mental disease or defect negating culpable mental state — AS

12.47.020

Procedure after raising defense of insanity — AS

12.47.090

Original Code Provision — AS

12.45.087

.

Sec. 12.47.080.
Procedure upon verdict of not guilty.

If a defendant is found not guilty under AS

12.47.040(a)(2)

, the prosecuting attorney shall, within 24 hours, file a petition under AS

47.30.700

for a screening investigation to determine the need for treatment if the prosecuting attorney has good cause to believe that the defendant is suffering from a mental illness and as a result is gravely disabled or likely to cause serious harm to self or others.

In this section, “mental illness” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.915

.

History.

(§ 22 ch 143 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

Definition of “mental illness” — AS

47.30.915

(12)

Form of verdict when evidence of mental disease or defect admissible — AS

12.47.040

Original Code Provision — None.

Sec. 12.47.090.
Procedure after raising defense of insanity.

At the time the defendant files notice to raise the affirmative defense of insanity under AS

12.47.010

or files notice under AS

12.47.020(a)

, the defendant shall also file notice as to whether, if found not guilty by reason of insanity under AS

12.47.010

or

12.47.020(b)

, the defendant will assert that the defendant is not presently suffering from any mental illness that causes the defendant to be dangerous to the public peace or safety.

If the defendant is found not guilty by reason of insanity under AS

12.47.010

or

12.47.020(b)

, and has not filed the notice required under (a) of this section, the court shall immediately commit the defendant to the custody of the commissioner of health and social services.

If the defendant is found not guilty by reason of insanity under AS

12.47.010

or

12.47.020(b)

, and has filed the notice required under (a) of this section, a hearing shall be held immediately after a verdict of not guilty by reason of insanity to determine the necessity of commitment. The hearing shall be held before the same trier of fact as heard the underlying charge. At the hearing, the defendant has the burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence that the defendant is not presently suffering from any mental illness that causes the defendant to be dangerous to the public. If the court or jury determines that the defendant has failed to meet the burden of proof, the court shall order the defendant committed to the custody of the commissioner of health and social services. If the hearing is before a jury, the verdict must be unanimous.

A defendant committed under (b) or (c) of this section shall be held in custody for a period of time not to exceed the maximum term of imprisonment for the crime for which the defendant was acquitted under AS

12.47.010

or

12.47.020(b)

or until the mental illness is cured or corrected as determined at a hearing under (e) of this section.

A defendant committed under (b) or (c) of this section may have the need for continuing commitment under this section reviewed by the court sitting without a jury under a petition filed in the superior court at intervals beginning no sooner than a year from the defendant’s initial commitment, and yearly thereafter. The burden and standard of proof at a hearing under this subsection are the same as at a hearing under (c) of this section. A copy of all petitions for release shall be served on the attorney general at Juneau, Alaska. A copy shall also be served upon the attorney of record, if the attorney of record is not the attorney general, who represented the state or a municipality at the time the defendant was first committed.

Continued commitment following expiration of the maximum term of imprisonment for the crime for which the defendant was acquitted under AS

12.47.010

or

12.47.020(b)

is governed by the standards pertaining to civil commitments as set out in AS

47.30.735

.

A person committed under this section may not be released during the term of commitment except upon court order following a hearing in accordance with (e) of this section. On the grounds that the defendant has been cured of any mental illness that would cause the defendant to be dangerous to the public peace or safety, the state may at any time request the court to hold a hearing to decide if the defendant should be released.

The commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner’s authorized representative shall submit periodic written reports to the court on the mental condition of a person committed under this section.

An order entered under (c) or (e) of this section may be reviewed by the court of appeals on appeal brought by either the defendant or the state within 40 days from the entry of the order.

If the court finds that a defendant committed under (b) or (c) of this section can be adequately controlled and treated in the community with proper supervision, the court may order the defendant conditionally released from confinement under AS

12.47.092

for a period of time not to exceed the maximum term of imprisonment for the crime for which the defendant was acquitted under AS

12.47.010

or

12.47.020(b)

or until the mental illness is cured or corrected, whichever first occurs, as determined at a hearing under (c) of this section.

In this section,

“dangerous” means a determination involving both the magnitude of the risk that the defendant will commit an act threatening the public peace or safety, as well as the magnitude of the harm that could be expected to result from this conduct; a finding that a defendant is “dangerous” may result from a great risk of relatively slight harm to persons or property, or may result from a relatively slight risk of substantial harm to persons or property;

“mental illness” means any mental condition that increases the propensity of the defendant to be dangerous to the public peace or safety; however, it is not required that the mental illness be sufficient to exclude criminal responsibility under AS

12.47.010

, or that the mental illness presently suffered by the defendant be the same one the defendant suffered at the time of the criminal conduct.

History.

(§ 22 ch 143 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

Insanity excluding responsibility — AS

12.47.010

Mental disease or defect negating culpable mental state — AS

12.47.020

Original Code Provision — AS 12.45.090.

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (j) was formerly (k) and subsection (k) was formerly (j). Relettered in 1995.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Properly licensed private treatment facilities may be used for the placement of persons committed to the commissioner of the Department of Health and Social Services pursuant to AS

12.47.090

and

12.47.110

. July 8, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

According to the House Commentary (House J. Supp. No. 64, at 7 (June 2, 1982)), the not guilty by reason of insanity commitment procedure “provides substantial protection for the public by requiring a person criminally committed to bear the burden of demonstrating his lack of danger to others before he is released,” the focus being on whether the mentally ill defendant is a threat to public peace or safety. December 5, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 12.47.092.
Procedure for conditional release.

A defendant committed to the custody of the commissioner of health and social services under AS

12.47.090(b)

or (c) may be conditionally released from confinement subject to the conditions and requirements for treatment that the court may impose, and placed under the supervision of the Department of Health and Social Services, a local government agency, a private agency, or an adult, who agrees to assume supervision of the defendant.

The commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner’s authorized representative shall submit, at a minimum, quarterly written reports to the court describing the defendant’s progress in treatment, compliance with conditions of release, and other information required by the court for defendants conditionally released under this section.

A person or agency responsible for supervision or treatment under an order for conditional release shall immediately notify the commissioner of health and social services upon the defendant’s failure to appear for required medication or treatment, or for failure to comply with other conditions imposed by the court.

If the court, after petition or on its own motion, reasonably believes that a conditionally released defendant is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of the conditional release, the court may order that the conditionally released defendant be apprehended and held until a hearing can be scheduled with the court to determine the facts and whether or not the defendant’s conditional release should be revoked or modified. Nothing in this subsection is intended to limit procedures available for emergency situations, including emergency detention under AS

47.30.705

.

The commissioner of health and social services or the conditionally released defendant may petition the court for modification of an order of conditional release. A petition by the defendant for modification of conditional release may not be filed more often than once every six months.

A defendant conditionally released under AS

12.47.090(j)

may petition the court for discharge in accordance with AS

12.47.090(e)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

Procedure After Raising Defense of Insanity — AS

12.47.090

Emergency Detention for Evaluation — AS

47.30.705

Original Code Provision — AS 12.45.090.

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1995, in subsection (f), “AS

12.47.090(j)

” was substituted for “AS

12.47.090(k)

” to reflect the 1995 relettering of AS

12.47.090(j)

and (k).

Sec. 12.47.095.
Notice to victims.

If an offender has been committed to the custody of the commissioner of health and social services under AS

12.47.090

, the victim of that crime is entitled to notice of a pending or actual change in the status of the offender. The commissioner of health and social services shall give notice as required by this section if

the offender has been continued in commitment following expiration of the maximum term of imprisonment under AS

12.47.090

(f) and the commissioner gives notice of release of the offender;

the court is to consider modification of an order of conditional release for the offender under AS

12.47.092(e)

;

a court is to consider conditional release of the offender under AS

12.47.090(j)

and

12.47.092(a)

;

the offender petitions for discharge under AS

12.47.092(f)

; or

the offender escapes, is released from custody on conditional release, furlough or authorized absence, or is discharged or released from custody for any reason.

If a victim desires notice under this section, the victim shall maintain a current, valid mailing address on file with the commissioner of health and social services. The commissioner shall send the notice required by this section to the victim’s last known address. The victim’s address may not be disclosed to the offender or offender’s attorney.

The commissioner of health and social services is required to give notice of a change in the status of an offender under this section to any victim who has requested notice.

If more than one person who qualifies as a victim under AS

12.55.185

desires notice, the commissioner of health and social services shall designate one person for purposes of receiving any notice required and exercising the rights granted by this section.

A victim who has received notice under (a) of this section that a change in the status of the offender is pending before a court has the right to submit to the court a written statement, or to appear personally at a hearing to present a written statement, and to give sworn testimony or an unsworn oral presentation to the court.

In this section,

“offender” has the meaning given in AS

12.61.020

;

“victim” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.185

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 59 SLA 1989; am §§ 1, 2 ch 10 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (e) enacted as (f).
Relettered in 1992, at which time former subsection (e) was relettered as (f).

In 1995, in paragraph (a)(3), “AS

12.47.090(j)

” was substituted for “AS

12.47.090(k)

” to reflect the 1995 relettering of AS

12.47.090(j)

and (k).

Sec. 12.47.100.
Incompetency to proceed.

A defendant who, as a result of mental disease or defect, is incompetent because the defendant is unable to understand the proceedings against the defendant or to assist in the defendant’s own defense may not be tried, convicted, or sentenced for the commission of a crime so long as the incompetency exists.

If, before imposition of sentence, the prosecuting attorney or the attorney for the defendant has reasonable cause to believe that the defendant is presently suffering from a mental disease or defect that causes the defendant to be unable to understand the proceedings or to assist in the person’s own defense, the attorney may file a motion for a judicial determination of the competency of the defendant. Upon that motion, or upon its own motion, the court shall have the defendant examined by at least one qualified psychiatrist or psychologist, who shall report to the court concerning the competency of the defendant. For the purpose of the examination, the court may order the defendant committed for a reasonable period to a suitable hospital or other facility designated by the court. If the report of the psychiatrist or psychologist indicates that the defendant is incompetent, the court shall hold a hearing, upon due notice, at which evidence as to the competency of the defendant may be submitted, including that of the reporting psychiatrist or psychologist, and make appropriate findings. Before the hearing, the court shall, upon request of the prosecuting attorney, order the defendant to submit to an additional evaluation by a psychiatrist or psychologist designated by the prosecuting attorney.

A defendant is presumed to be competent. The party raising the issue of competency bears the burden of proving the defendant is incompetent by a preponderance of the evidence. When the court raises the issue of competency, the burden of proving the defendant is incompetent shall be on the party who elects to advocate for a finding of incompetency. The court shall then apply the preponderance of the evidence standard to determine whether the defendant is competent.

A statement made by the defendant in the course of an examination into the person’s competency under this section, whether the examination is with or without the consent of the defendant, may not be admitted in evidence against the defendant on the issue of guilt in a criminal proceeding unless the defendant later relies on a defense under AS

12.47.010

or

12.47.020

. A finding by the judge that the defendant is competent to stand trial in no way prejudices the defendant in a defense based on insanity; the finding may not be introduced in evidence on that issue or otherwise be brought to the notice of the jury.

In determining whether a person has sufficient intellectual functioning to adapt or cope with the ordinary demands of life, the court shall consider whether the person has obtained a driver’s license, is able to maintain employment, or is competent to testify as a witness under the Alaska Rules of Evidence.

In determining if the defendant is unable to understand the proceedings against the defendant, the court shall consider, among other factors considered relevant by the court, whether the defendant understands that the defendant has been charged with a criminal offense and that penalties can be imposed; whether the defendant understands what criminal conduct is being alleged; whether the defendant understands the roles of the judge, jury, prosecutor, and defense counsel; whether the defendant understands that the defendant will be expected to tell defense counsel the circumstances, to the best of the defendant’s ability, surrounding the defendant’s activities at the time of the alleged criminal conduct; and whether the defendant can distinguish between a guilty and not guilty plea.

In determining if the defendant is unable to assist in the defendant’s own defense, the court shall consider, among other factors considered relevant by the court, whether the defendant’s mental disease or defect affects the defendant’s ability to recall and relate facts pertaining to the defendant’s actions at times relevant to the charges and whether the defendant can respond coherently to counsel’s questions. A defendant is able to assist in the defense even though the defendant’s memory may be impaired, the defendant refuses to accept a course of action that counsel or the court believes is in the defendant’s best interest, or the defendant is unable to suggest a particular strategy or to choose among alternative defenses.

In a hearing to determine competency under this section, the court may, at the court’s discretion, allow a witness, including a psychiatrist or psychologist who examined the defendant, to testify concerning the competency of the defendant by contemporaneous two-way video conference if the witness is in a place from which people customarily travel by air to the court, and the procedure allows the parties a fair opportunity to examine the witness. The video conference technician shall be the only person in the presence of the witness unless the court, at the court’s discretion, determines that another person may be present. Any person present with the witness must be identified on the record. In this subsection, “contemporaneous two-way video conference”

means a conference among people at different places by means of transmitted audio and video signals;

includes all communication technologies that allow people at two or more places to interact by two-way video and audio transmissions simultaneously.

History.

(§ 22 ch 143 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 1996; am § 18 ch 1 TSSLA 2012)

Cross references. —

Definition of “mental disease or defect” — AS

12.47.130

Commitment on finding of incompetency — AS

12.47.110

Determination of sanity after commitment — AS

12.47.120

Original Code Provision — AS 12.45.100.

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, “preponderance of the” was substituted for “preponderance of” in the second sentence of subsection (c), to correct a manifest error in § 1, ch. 62, SLA 1996.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, added (h).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 27(b), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that subsection (h) applies to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2012.

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent concerning the amendment of this section made by § 1,
ch. 62, SLA 1996 (HCS SB 321(JUD)), see 1996 House Journal 4203-4205.

For the governor's transmittal letter concerning
ch. 1, TSSLA 2012 (HB 359), see 2012 House Journal 1666 — 1668.

Sec. 12.47.110.
Commitment on finding of incompetency.

When the trial court determines by a preponderance of the evidence, in accordance with AS

12.47.100

, that a defendant is so incompetent that the defendant is unable to understand the proceedings against the defendant or to assist in the defendant’s own defense, the court shall order the proceedings stayed, except as provided in (d) of this section, and shall commit a defendant charged with a felony, and may commit a defendant charged with any other crime, to the custody of the commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner’s authorized representative for further evaluation and treatment until the defendant is mentally competent to stand trial, or until the pending charges against the defendant are disposed of according to law, but in no event longer than 90 days.

On or before the expiration of the initial 90-day period of commitment, the court shall conduct a hearing to determine whether or not the defendant remains incompetent. If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant remains incompetent, the court may recommit the defendant for a second period of 90 days. The court shall determine at the expiration of the second 90-day period whether the defendant has become competent. If, at the expiration of the second 90-day period, the court determines that the defendant continues to be incompetent to stand trial, the charges against the defendant shall be dismissed without prejudice, and continued commitment of the defendant shall be governed by the provisions relating to civil commitments under AS

47.30.700

—

47.30.915

unless the defendant is charged with a crime involving force against a person and the court finds that the defendant presents a substantial danger of physical injury to other persons and that there is a substantial probability that the defendant will regain competency within a reasonable period of time, in which case the court may extend the period of commitment for an additional six months. If the defendant remains incompetent at the expiration of the additional six-month period, the charges shall be dismissed without prejudice, and continued commitment proceedings shall be governed by the provisions relating to civil commitment under AS

47.30.700

—

47.30.915

. If the defendant remains incompetent for five years after the charges have been dismissed under this subsection, the defendant may not be charged again for an offense arising out of the facts alleged in the original charges, except if the original charge is a class A felony or unclassified felony.

The defendant is not responsible for the expenses of hospitalization or transportation incurred as a result of the defendant’s commitment under this section. Liability for payment under AS

47.30.910

does not apply to commitments under this section.

A defendant receiving medication for either a physical or a mental condition may not be prohibited from standing trial, if the medication either enables the defendant to understand the proceedings and to properly assist in the defendant’s defense or does not disable the defendant from understanding the proceedings and assisting in the defendant’s own defense.

A defendant charged with a felony and found to be incompetent to proceed under this section is rebuttably presumed to be mentally ill and to present a likelihood of serious harm to self or others in proceedings under AS

47.30.700

—

47.30.915

. In evaluating whether a defendant is likely to cause serious harm, the court may consider as recent behavior the conduct with which the defendant was originally charged.

History.

(§ 22 ch 143 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 62 SLA 1996; am §§ 19 — 21 ch 75 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

Incompetency to proceed — AS

12.47.100

Determination of sanity after commitment — AS

12.47.120

Original Code Provision — AS 12.45.110.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Properly licensed private treatment facilities may be used for the placement of persons committed to the commissioner of the Department of Health and Social Services pursuant to AS

12.47.090

and

12.47.110

. July 8, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.